Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-615
Licensure as nurse midwife; application; requirements; temporary licensure.

(1) An applicant for licensure under the Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act to practice as a certified nurse midwife shall submit such evidence as the board requires showing that the applicant is currently licensed as a registered nurse by the state or has the authority based on the Nurse Licensure Compact to practice as a registered nurse in Nebraska, has successfully completed an approved certified nurse midwifery education program, and is certified as a nurse midwife by a board-approved certifying body.

(2) The department may, with the approval of the board, grant temporary licensure as a certified nurse midwife for up to one hundred twenty days upon application (a) to graduates of an approved nurse midwifery program pending results of the first certifying examination following graduation and (b) to nurse midwives currently licensed in another state pending completion of the application for a Nebraska license. A temporary license issued pursuant to this subsection may be extended for up to one year with the approval of the board.

(3) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

(4) If more than five years have elapsed since the completion of the nurse midwifery program or since the applicant has practiced as a nurse midwife, the applicant shall meet the requirements in subsection (1) of this section and provide evidence of continuing competency, as may be determined by the board, either by means of a reentry program, references, supervised practice, examination, or one or more of the continuing competency activities listed in section 38-145.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 76;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 175;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 63;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 107;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 89;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1755;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 227;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 40.

Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-201.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.

Nurse Licensure Compact, see section 71-1795.01.